District of Columbia statutes.
12-304

Actions stayed by court or statute.

When the bringing of an action is stayed by an injunction or other order of a court of justice, or by statutory prohibition, the time of the stay may not be computed as a part of the period within which the action must be brought.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 12-304.
1973 Ed., § 12-304.

Prior Codifications